Idaho statutes. Title 23 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
Chapter 10 BEER
§ 23-1015. County retailers’ license, when required, procedure.

It shall be unlawful for any retailer to sell beer without first procuring a retailer’s license from the county, said license to be issued on such conditions and terms as may be required by the board of county commissioners in the county wherein such place of sale of beer is located; provided, that no county shall exact a license fee from any dealer except as follows:

Where such retailer sells only bottled or canned beer: none of which is consumed on the premises where sold, the license fee shall be equal to twenty-five per cent (25%) of the license fee exacted under subsection (1)(b) of this section relating to draught beer and bottled or canned beer, or draught beer only; and where such bottled or canned beer is consumed on the premises where sold the license fee shall be seventy-five per cent (75%) of the fee exacted under said subsection (b) hereof.

Where such retailer sells draught beer and bottled or canned beer, or draught beer only, not in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), a year.

The board of county commissioners shall establish a procedure for processing applications for licenses, transfers or renewals thereof in a timely manner. Each application for a license, transfer or renewal thereof, required by the provisions of this section, shall be submitted to the board of county commissioners for a decision. The board of county commissioners shall have a reasonable time to examine the application before a decision is made on granting or denying the license, or the transfer or renewal thereof. Each board of county commissioners shall establish, by ordinance, a time period within which a decision must be made following submission of an application. Whenever a board of county commissioners denies an application, the board shall specify in writing:

The statutes, ordinances and standards used in evaluating the application;

The reasons for denial; and

The actions, if any, that the applicant could take to obtain the license, transfer or renewal thereof.

An applicant denied a license, transfer or renewal thereof or aggrieved by a decision of the board of county commissioners pursuant to this section may, within twenty-eight (28) days, after all remedies have been exhausted under county ordinances or procedures, seek judicial review under the procedures provided in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and for such purposes a county shall be construed to mean an agency.

In all cases where the board of county commissioners is considering applications for licenses, transfers or renewals thereof, a transcribable verbatim record of the proceedings shall be made. If the application for a license, transfer or renewal is denied, a transcribable, verbatim record of the proceedings shall be kept for a period of not less than six (6) months after a final decision on the matter. Upon written request and within the time period provided for retention of the record, any person may have the record transcribed at his expense. The board of county commissioners shall also provide for the keeping of minutes of the proceedings. Minutes shall be retained indefinitely or as otherwise provided by law.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 7-A, as added by 1947, ch. 192, § 7, p. 462; am. 1983, ch. 50, § 3, p. 120; am. 1993, ch. 216, § 6, p. 587.

§ 23-1016. Municipal license also required — Procedure.

It shall be competent and lawful for an incorporated municipality within the county wherein said county license to sell beer is granted by the county, by proper ordinance and regulation, to prohibit the sale of beer within the incorporated limits of such incorporated municipality until a retailer’s license is first obtained from such incorporated municipality. Provided, however, that no incorporated municipality shall issue a license to any retailer until such retailer shall have first obtained a county license from the board of county commissioners, and that a revocation of the license granted by the board of county commissioners shall work a revocation of license granted by such incorporated municipality. Provided, further, that no municipality, whether operating under a special charter or otherwise, shall exact a license fee from any retailer except as follows:

Where such retailer sells only bottled or canned beer: none of which is consumed on the premises where sold, the license fee shall be equal to twenty-five per cent (25%) of the license fee exacted under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Where such retailer sells for consumption on the premises, draught beer and bottled or canned beer or draught beer only, not in excess of two hundred dollars ($200) a year.

The city council shall establish by ordinance a procedure for processing applications for licenses, transfers or renewals thereof in a timely manner. Each application for a license, transfer or renewal thereof, required by the provisions of this section, shall be submitted to the city council for a decision. The city council shall have a reasonable time to examine the application before a decision is made on granting or denying the license, or the transfer or renewal thereof. Each city council shall establish, by ordinance, a time period within which a decision must be made following submission of an application. Whenever a city council denies an application, the council shall specify in writing:

The statutes, ordinances and standards used in evaluating the application;

The reasons for denial; and

The actions, if any, that the applicant could take to obtain the license, transfer or renewal thereof.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the delegation of the processing of an application and the granting or denying thereof, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to a municipality’s city clerk. If the licensing power is delegated, an applicant denied a license, transfer, or renewal thereof may appeal the city clerk’s decision to the city council, within the time and in the manner as the city council may provide by ordinance.

An applicant denied a license, transfer or renewal thereof or aggrieved by a decision of the city council pursuant to this section may, within twenty-eight (28) days, after all remedies have been exhausted under city ordinances and procedures, seek judicial review under the procedures provided in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and for such purposes a city shall be construed to mean an agency.

In all cases where the city council is considering an application for or hearing an appeal from a denial of a license, transfer or renewal thereof, a transcribable verbatim record of the proceedings shall be made. If the application for or appeal from a denial of a license, transfer or renewal is denied, a transcribable, verbatim record of the proceedings shall be kept for a period of not less than six (6) months after a final decision on the matter. For the purpose of this section, the date of final decision shall be the date upon which the written decision of the city council is transmitted. Upon written request and within the time period provided for retention of the record, any person may have the record transcribed at his expense. The city council shall also provide for the keeping of minutes of the proceedings. Minutes shall be retained indefinitely or as otherwise provided by law.
History.

1935, ch. 132, § 7-B, as added by 1947, ch. 192, § 7, p. 462; am. 1981, ch. 237, § 1, p. 477; am. 1983, ch. 50, § 4, p. 120; am. 1987, ch. 12, § 1, p. 16; am. 1993, ch. 216, § 7, p. 587.

§ 23-1017. Intention of preceding section.

It is hereby declared to be the intention of section 23-1016[, Idaho Code,] that both counties and incorporated municipalities may levy and collect a license [fee] for the retail sale of beer as herein provided, and the granting of power to license retailer of beer in an incorporated municipality shall not be held as in any way conflicting with the provisions of this act relating to the granting of retailer’s license by the county.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 7-C, as added by 1947, ch. 192, § 7, p. 462.

§ 23-1018. Sale of keg beer — Penalties.

Retail and wholesale licensees selling keg beer for consumption off licensed premises shall place an identification tag onto all kegs of beer at the time of sale and require the signing of a receipt therefor by the purchaser in order to allow kegs to be traced if the contents are used in violation of this act. The keg identification shall be in the form of a numbered label prescribed and supplied by the director of the Idaho state police, which identifies the seller and which is removable or obliterated when the keg is processed for refilling. The receipt shall be on a form prescribed and supplied by the director of the Idaho state police and shall include the name and address of the purchaser and such other information as may be required by the director of the Idaho state police.

Any licensee selling keg beer for off-premises consumption who fails to require the signing of a receipt at the time of sale and fails to place a numbered identification label onto the keg shall be subject to having his license suspended as set forth in section 23-1038, Idaho Code.

Possession of a keg containing beer which is not identified as required by subsection (1) of this section is a misdemeanor.

Any purchaser of keg beer who knowingly provides false information on the receipt required by subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

As used in this section, “keg” means any brewery-sealed, individual container of beer having a liquid capacity of five (5) gallons or more.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1018, as added by 1981, ch. 76, § 1, p. 108; am. 1989, ch. 314, § 1, p. 810; am. 1990, ch. 428, § 1, p. 1184; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 70, p. 1450; am. 2013, ch. 95, § 2, p. 232.

§ 23-1019. Beer sample tasting requirements and limitations for events on retail beer licensed premises.

Breweries, wholesalers and distributors may conduct or assist a retail beer licensee at a beer sample tasting on premises not licensed for the sale of beer by the individual glass or opened bottle for consumption on the premises or on the premises of the holder of a beer by the drink license for the purpose of promoting their beer products to the public. The holder of a retail beer license or a beer by the drink license may also conduct beer sample tasting events, with or without the assistance of a brewery, wholesaler or distributor in accordance with this section.

A retail beer licensee shall not be required to hold a beer by the drink license for the purpose of conducting or permitting beer sample tasting events on the premises in accordance with this section unless a charge or other consideration is required of the customer by the retailer in exchange for such beer sample.

Sample tasting events permitted pursuant to this section shall be conducted subject to all of the following requirements:

Sample sizes. The size of each sample of beer shall not exceed one and one-half (1.5) ounces.

Identified tasting area. The retail beer licensee who conducts tastings or who allows a brewer, wholesaler, distributor or retailer to conduct tastings on the retail beer premises shall identify a specific tasting area or areas. Such area or areas shall be of a size and design such that the retail beer licensee and the persons conducting the tasting can observe and control persons in the area to ensure that no minors or visibly intoxicated persons possess or consume alcohol. Customers must remain in the tasting area or areas until they have finished consuming the sample. The retailer shall keep on file at the premises a floor plan identifying the tasting area or areas. If a retailer does not have an identified tasting area or areas, the director may require prior approval of an area or areas before the retailer conducts any more tastings or allows any more tastings to be conducted by the brewer, distributor or retailer on the premises.

Number of in-store tastings. Although there is no limit on the number of tastings a retailer may conduct without the assistance of a brewer, wholesaler or distributor, the retailer shall not permit a brewer or distributor to conduct, or assist in conducting, tastings on the premises of the same licensee more than eight (8) times per calendar year.

Brewer, wholesaler or distributor conducted tastings. A brewer, wholesaler or distributor may hold tastings on consecutive days on one (1) retail premises, provided the tastings shall not exceed two (2) consecutive days. Tastings shall be conducted at least four (4) weeks apart. If a brewer, wholesaler or distributor holds tastings on two (2) consecutive days, they shall not hold another tasting on those retail premises for at least four (4) weeks.

Server requirements. Persons serving or pouring beer at beer tastings on premises for which a beer by the drink license has not been issued must be at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

Brewer, wholesaler or distributor conducted sample tastings. A brewer, wholesaler or distributor may conduct beer sample tastings on premises licensed for the sale of beer for products produced or sold by the brewer, wholesaler or distributor. The brewer or distributor conducting the beer sample tasting shall, in addition to compliance with other requirements of this section, comply with all of the following requirements:
(a) Provide the product to be tasted and remove any remaining product at the end of the tasting.

Retailer conducted beer sample tastings. Retail beer licensees and beer by the drink licensees may conduct beer sample tastings on their licensed premises and may:

Accept assistance from a brewer, wholesaler or distributor if:

The only assistance provided is an employee to provide information or education relating to the product being sampled;

The retailer pays for the beer; and

The retailer is responsible for any advertising.

Conduct an unlimited number of beer sample tastings on the premises if there is no brewer or distributor providing assistance for the event. The retailer may advertise such events.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, participation by a brewer, wholesaler or distributor in a beer sample tasting event, if expressly authorized by this section, shall not constitute prohibited conduct or unlawful aid to a retailer.

(b) Provide or pay for a person to serve the beer. The server must be an employee or agent of the brewer or distributor and shall not be an employee or agent of a retailer. The brewer or distributor shall not compensate any employee or agent of the retail licensee to participate in the tasting.

(c) The brewer or distributor shall keep a record of each tasting it conducts, including the date and location of each event and the products served.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1019, as added by 2014, ch. 174, § 1, p. 478.

§ 23-1020. Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 10, p. 312.

§ 23-1021. Revenue received from beer tax. [Repealed.]

§ 23-1022. Separability.

If any portion of this act shall be declared unconstitutional it shall not invalidate the other provisions thereof.

History.

1935, ch. 132, § 13, p. 312.

§ 23-1023. Beer — Authorization to deliver.

The prohibition upon possession of beer by any person under twenty-one (21) years of age does not apply to possession by a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years making a delivery of beer in pursuance of the order of his parent or in pursuance of his employment, or when such person under the age of twenty-one (21) years is in a private residence accompanied by his parent or guardian and with such parent’s or guardian’s consent.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1023, as added by 1953, ch. 72, § 1, p. 94; am. 1967, ch. 351, § 1, p. 995; am. 1972, ch. 332, § 6, p. 834; am. 1987, ch. 212, § 11, p. 448; am. 1997, ch. 68, § 1, p. 144; am. 1999, ch. 59, § 10, p. 151.

§ 23-1024. False representation as being twenty-one or more years of age a misdemeanor.

Any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who shall by any means represent to any person licensed to sell beer at retail or wholesale, or to any agent or employee of such retail or wholesale licensee, that he or she is twenty-one (21) or more years of age for the purpose of entering licensed premises or inducing such retail or wholesale licensee, his agent or employee, to sell, serve or dispense beer to him or her shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who shall by any means represent to any such retail or wholesale licensee, his agent or employee, that any other person is twenty-one (21) or more years of age, when in fact such other person is under the age of twenty-one (21) years, for the purpose of entering licensed premises or inducing such retail or wholesale licensee, his agent or employee, to sell, serve or dispense beer to such other person, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1024, as added by 1953, ch. 72, § 1, p. 94; am. 1972, ch. 332, § 7, p. 834; am. 1987, ch. 212, § 12, p. 448; am. 1991, ch. 269, § 3, p. 660.

§ 23-1025. License and transfer fees — Alcohol beverage control fund.

All moneys from license and transfer fees that are collected by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over to the state treasurer for deposit in the alcohol beverage control fund created in section 23-940, Idaho Code. All other moneys collected by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1025, as added by 2012, ch. 160, § 2, p. 435.

§ 23-1026. Posting of sign containing law regulating sales to minors. [Repealed.]

§ 23-1027. Certificate of approval required of manufacturer.

It shall be unlawful for any person licensed under the provisions of this act, to purchase, import, transport or cause to be transported into or within the state of Idaho any beer for resale therein, unless prior thereto a certificate of approval shall have been issued by the director to the manufacturer of such beer. The certificate of approval herein required shall be issued to a manufacturer of beer upon application therefor provided the manufacturer shall have first agreed in writing with the director as follows:

to furnish to the director, on or before the 15th day of each month, a written report under oath on a form to be prescribed by the director showing the quantity of beer sold, delivered or shipped to each wholesaler or dealer of beer licensed in this state for resale in this state; and

that such manufacturer and every person employed by it or acting as its agents (other than wholesalers and dealers licensed in this state) will faithfully comply with and observe all the provisions of the laws of the state of Idaho relating to beer and all rules and regulations adopted by the director pursuant to such laws.

If, after obtaining such certificate, any such manufacturer shall fail to submit such report, or, if it, or any such person employed by it or acting as its agent, shall violate the terms of such agreement, the director may determine to revoke or suspend such certificate by reason thereof. The procedure for giving notice of such determination and for proceedings to contest determination as provided for in sections 23-1037 through 23-1045, Idaho Code, shall govern insofar as they may be applicable. The district court of Ada County shall have jurisdiction of any such proceedings to contest the director’s determination.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1027, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 5, p. 543; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 48, p. 811.

§ 23-1028. Warehouse and records of wholesalers and dealers.

Each licensed wholesaler and dealer shall sell and distribute beer in this state only from stocks of beer which have been unloaded, stored and maintained in a warehouse or warehouses owned or used by such wholesaler or dealer within the state of Idaho in the conduct of his business as such. All records which a wholesaler or dealer is by law or rule required to maintain, shall be kept at his warehouse within the state of Idaho, or, if such wholesaler or dealer shall have more than one (1) warehouse, then in the warehouse of such wholesaler or dealer which he shall designate as his principal warehouse within the state. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the existing rights of any person who, on and prior to January 1, 1996, was licensed as a wholesaler by the state of Idaho.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1028, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 5, p. 543; am. 1996, ch. 329, § 1, p. 1122.

§ 23-1029. Posting of prices.

Each licensed wholesaler, brewer and dealer engaged in selling beer for resale within this state, shall file with the director a written schedule of prices to be charged by him for beer sold within this state for resale therein, which schedule of prices shall be uniform for the same class of buyers in the same trade area within this state, and shall set forth;

all brands and types of products offered for sale;

the delivered sale price thereof in the several trade areas of the state to the various classes of buyers; and

any allowance granted for returned containers.

an increase in prices, for a minimum period of thirty (30) days;

a reduction in prices, for a minimum period of six (6) months.

Such schedule of prices so filed may be changed or modified from time to time by filing with the director a new schedule of prices, not less than ten (10) days prior to the last day of the filing calendar month, becoming effective on the first day of the succeeding calendar month.

Such schedule of prices so filed shall not be withdrawn within ten (10) days of its effective date. An amendment of the prior filing shall show the posting changes of the particular brand and product affected. The amendment shall be in the form of a statement to the director detailing the reasons for the amendment. The amendment submitted to the director shall be prima facie evidence of its correctness; and failure of the director to act upon denial of the amendment within ten (10) days shall constitute its adoption. Upon becoming effective the schedule shall remain in effect as follows:

All price schedules, so filed, shall be subject to public inspection and shall not be considered confidential. Upon the filing of the original schedule of prices, and after the effective date of any schedule of prices amendatory thereto, all prices therein stated shall be strictly adhered to, and any departure or variation therefrom shall constitute the giving of aid or assistance prohibited by the provisions of section 23-1033, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1029, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 5, p. 543; am. 1969, ch. 276, § 1, p. 819; am. 1972, ch. 33, § 1, p. 51; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 49, p. 811; am. 1975, ch. 151, § 1, p. 383; am. 1979, ch. 136, § 1, p. 432.

§ 23-1030. Size of containers.

No dealer or wholesaler shall purchase, receive or resell any beer except in the original container as prepared for the market by the brewer at the place of manufacture.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1030, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 5, p. 543; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 50, p. 811; am. 1994, ch. 14, § 1, p. 20.

§ 23-1031. Extension of credit.

No sale or delivery of beer shall be made to any licensed retailer, except for cash paid at the time of or prior to delivery thereof, or except as provided by electronic funds transfer in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, and in no event shall any brewer, wholesaler or dealer licensed in the state and engaged in the sale of beer for resale extend any credit on account of such beer to a licensed retailer, nor shall any licensed retailer accept or receive delivery of such beer except when payment therefor is made in cash at the time of or prior to delivery thereof, or by electronic funds transfer in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

The acceptance of a first party check from a licensed retailer by a brewer, wholesaler or dealer licensed in the state and engaged in the sale of beer for resale, or the use of a debit card by a licensed retailer, shall not be deemed an extension or acceptance of credit pursuant to this section.

The acceptance and use of an electronic funds transfer shall not be deemed an extension or acceptance of credit pursuant to this section, provided such transfer is initiated and completed promptly and in no event completed later than five (5) business days following delivery of such beer. Any attempt by a licensed retailer to delay payment of an electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section for any period of time beyond the time set forth in this subsection, shall be deemed an acceptance of credit by the licensed retailer.

Any extension or acceptance of credit in violation hereof shall constitute the giving and receiving of aid or assistance to or by a licensed retailer prohibited by the provisions of section 23-1033, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1031, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 5, p. 543; am. 1965, ch. 176, § 1, p. 362; am. 1999, ch. 206, § 2, p. 553; am. 2011, ch. 255, § 1, p. 699; am. 2013, ch. 288, § 1, p. 760.

§ 23-1032. Financial interest in dealer or wholesaler prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any brewer, directly or indirectly, or through an affiliate, subsidiary, officer, director, agent or employee to have any financial interest in any licensed wholesaler’s or dealer’s business, or to own or control any real property upon which a licensed dealer or wholesaler conducts business, except:

For a brewer licensed within the state of Idaho who produces fewer than thirty thousand (30,000) barrels of beer annually and is duly licensed as a wholesaler as provided in section 23-1003(f), Idaho Code;

If a licensed dealer or wholesaler has been granted distribution rights by a brewer for a brand in a designated territory and is unable to service the designated sales territory for reasons that are not the result of an action by the brewer, or in the event of a termination, cancellation, discontinuance or failure to renew a distribution agreement between a brewer and a licensed dealer or wholesaler for reasons set forth in section 23-1105, Idaho Code, such as insolvency, loss of licensure or fraud and in accordance with the provisions of chapter 11, title 23, Idaho Code, a brewer shall be allowed to appoint a temporary licensed dealer or wholesaler to service the brewer’s brands in the designated sales territory and, for a period not to exceed five (5) years, to have any financial interest in the temporary licensed dealer or wholesaler; or

If a licensed dealer or wholesaler is voluntarily selling its distribution rights, a brewer whose brand distribution rights are being transferred may have any financial interest in the purchasing distributor for a period not to exceed five (5) years to assist in financing the purchase.

It shall be unlawful for any licensed wholesaler or dealer, directly or indirectly, or through an affiliate, subsidiary, officer, director, agent or employee to have any financial interest in a licensed brewer’s business, or to own or control any real property upon which a licensed brewer conducts business. This section shall not apply to a noncontrolling de minimis interest in stock held in a publicly traded company including mutual funds.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1032, as added by 2014, ch. 244, § 1, p. 613.

§ 23-1033. Financial interest in or aid to retailers prohibited — Certain aid permitted.

Except as provided in sections 23-1003(d), and 23-1003(e), Idaho Code, it shall be unlawful for any brewer, dealer, wholesaler, or the holder of any certificate of approval, directly or indirectly, or through an affiliate, subsidiary, officer, director, agent or employee:

To have any financial interest in any licensed retailer’s business, or to own or control any real property upon which a licensed retailer conducts his business, except such property as shall have been so owned or controlled continuously for more than one (1) year prior to July 1, 1975; provided however, that a brewer licensed pursuant to section 23-1003(d) or (e), Idaho Code, may be permitted to have a financial interest in one (1) additional brewery licensed pursuant to section 23-1003(d) or (e), Idaho Code; or

To aid or assist any licensed retailer by giving such retailer, or any employee thereof, any discounts, premiums or rebates in connection with any sale of beer; or

To aid or assist any licensed retailer by furnishing, giving, renting, lending or selling any equipment, signs, supplies, services, or other thing of value to the retailer which may be used in conducting the retailer’s retail beer business, except as expressly permitted by this chapter; or

To enter into any lease or other agreement with any retail licensee to control the product or products sold by such retailer; or

To provide for any rental or other charge to be paid to or by the retailer for product display or advertising display space.

A brewer, dealer, or wholesaler as an incident to merchandising in the ordinary course of business, and if available to all licensed retailers without discrimination, may sell to a retailer equipment, supplies, or clothing which may be used in conducting the retailer’s retail business. A brewer, dealer or wholesaler may not sell such equipment or supplies at a price, or under terms, intended or designed to encourage or induce the retailer to use products of the seller to the exclusion of the products of other brewers, dealers or wholesalers. In no event shall the sales price be less than the reasonable value of such equipment or supplies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, a brewer, dealer, or wholesaler, as an incident to merchandising in the ordinary course of business, and if available to all retailers within the brewer, dealer or wholesaler’s service area, without discrimination, may lend, give, furnish or sell to a retailer, the following items:

Necessary accessory equipment, such as shaft blowers, tapping devices, valves, beer hoses, washers, couplings, clamps, air hoses, vents, faucets, CO
gas regulators, picnic or party pumps, together with necessary nonmechanical or nonenergized equipment to enable cooling of beer, and CO
gas or ice when the same is furnished at the current retail price and as a bona fide sale in the regular course of business;

Signs, posters, placards, designs, devices, decorations or graphic displays bearing advertising matter and for use in windows or elsewhere in the interior of a retail establishment. The brewer, dealer or wholesaler shall not directly or indirectly pay or credit the retailer for displaying such materials or for any expense incidental to their operation;

Newspaper cuts, mats or engraved blocks for use in retailer’s advertisements;

Items such as sports schedules, posters, calendars, informational pamphlets, decals and other similar materials for display at the point of sale which bear brand advertising for beer prominently displayed thereon, and which items are intended for use by the retailer’s customers off the licensed premises and which items are made available to the retailer’s customers for such purpose;
(e) Temporary signs or banners displaying a brewer’s, dealer’s or wholesaler’s name, trademark or label, which signs may be permitted to be temporarily displayed on the exterior portion of the retailer premises in connection with a special event, in accordance with such rules relating thereto as may be established by the director.

A distributor may perform services incident to or in connection with the following:

The stocking, rotation and restocking of beer sold and delivered to such licensed retailer on or in such licensed retailer’s storeroom, salesroom shelves or refrigerating units, including the marking or remarking of containers of such beer to indicate the selling price as established by the retailer and to the arranging, rearranging, or relocating of advertising displays referred to in this section. For the purposes of this paragraph, a wholesaler may, with the permission of the retailer, and in accordance with space allocations directed by the retailer, set, remove, replace, reset or relocate all beer upon the shelves of the retailer. Labor performed or schematics prepared by the wholesaler relating to conduct authorized pursuant to this paragraph shall not constitute prohibited conduct or unlawful aid to a retailer;

The inspection of a licensed retailer’s draught equipment to insure sanitation and quality control;
(b)(i) The inspection of a licensed retailer’s draught equipment to insure sanitation and quality control;

The instruction of licensed retailers in the proper use, maintenance and care of draught equipment, glasses and products used in the sale and dispensing of beer and the preparation and distribution of written information or instructions to licensed retailers with respect thereto;

The tapping of kegs;

A wholesaler may perform such services as may be required to maintain sanitation or quality control and which are incident to the repair and cleaning of a retailer’s draught beer equipment and may furnish or sell the necessary equipment and repair parts and cleaning supplies required in the performance of such services.

A wholesaler may assist a retailer by temporarily providing storage of the retailer’s beer for a period not in excess of seven (7) days in the event that such storage is necessary to maintain the quality of such beer during a temporary loss or failure of the retailer’s refrigeration equipment.

A brewery, dealer or wholesaler may furnish or give to a retailer authorized to sell beer for consumption on the licensed premises, for sampling purposes only, a container of beer containing not more than sixty-four (64) ounces, not currently being sold by the retailer, and which container is clearly marked “NOT FOR SALE—FOR SAMPLING PURPOSES ONLY.”

The word “ale” or “malt liquor” may be substituted for “beer” on any sign used in connection with any advertising herein permitted, provided reference shall be to ale or malt liquor which has an alcoholic content not greater than the limitation prescribed in section 23-1002, Idaho Code.

Every violation of the provisions of this section by a dealer, brewer or wholesaler, in which a licensed retailer shall have actively participated shall constitute a violation on the part of such licensed retailer.

2

2

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1033, as added by 1975, ch. 151, § 3, p. 383; am. 1976, ch. 34, § 1, p. 71; am. 1978, ch. 59, § 1, p. 115; am. 1984, ch. 232, § 1, p. 560; am. 1987, ch. 22, § 3, p. 29; am. 1991, ch. 159, § 1, p. 380; am. 1994, ch. 361, § 1, p. 1131; am. 2012, ch. 191, § 1, p. 515.

§ 23-1033A. Prohibition of certain trade practices between brewers or dealers and wholesalers.

It shall be unlawful for any brewer or dealer, directly or indirectly, or through an affiliate, subsidiary, officer, director, agent or employee:

To require that any wholesaler purchase any such beer or other distributed products from such person to the exclusion in whole or in part of beer or other products made or imported by other dealers or brewers;

To discriminate in price, allowance, rebate, refund, commission, discount, or service between the wholesalers purchasing beer or other products from such brewer or dealer;

To threaten any wholesaler with any discrimination prohibited under subsection (1)(b) of this section, with the purpose or effect of changing or maintaining resale prices of the wholesaler;

To impose conditions or restrictions on a wholesaler not generally imposed on other wholesalers of such brewer.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit brewers or dealers from selecting their own customers in bona fide transactions not in restraint of trade, nor to prohibit a brewer, or any affiliate or subsidiary of such brewer, duly licensed as a wholesaler from selling and distributing beer or other products manufactured by such brewer at wholesale to the exclusion of beer or other products manufactured by any other brewers. The terms “wholesaler” and “wholesalers” as used in this section shall mean a wholesaler or wholesalers licensed and engaged as such in the sale and distribution of beer in the state of Idaho.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1033A, as added by 1977, ch. 148, § 1, p. 326; am. 2000, ch. 428, § 1, p. 1383.

§ 23-1034. Sanitation rules for retailers.

Licensed retailers authorized to sell beer for consumption upon such licensee’s premises, shall keep their premises and all coils, cups, mugs, steins, glasses, and other utensils used in connection with the sale and dispensing of beer in a sanitary condition at all times, and shall comply with all rules issued by the department of health and welfare in the state of Idaho and applicable to the operation of the business of such licensed retailer.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1034, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 5, p. 543; am. 1974, ch. 117, § 1, p. 1288; am. 1995, ch. 172, § 1, p. 654.

§ 23-1035. Retailer’s signs.

Signs indicating that beer is sold or dispensed on any particular premises shall be displayed only on the exterior portion of the building where the licensed retailer shall carry on his business of selling beer at retail or on property on which any such building is situated and which is owned or possessed by such retailer as a part of his business premises. No more than two (2) single-faced signs or one (1) double-faced sign indicating that beer is sold or dispensed on the premises shall be displayed on such building or property. No dimension of any such sign shall exceed sixty (60) inches and the area of each face of a double-faced and of each single-faced sign shall not exceed fifteen hundred (1,500) square inches measured in such manner as the director may by regulation prescribe. No such sign shall display or make reference to the name of any brewer or the trade name, trademark or label of any brand of beer.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1035, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 5, p. 543; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 51, p. 811; am. 1994, ch. 14, § 9, p. 20.

§ 23-1036. Tap markers.

Every faucet, spigot or other dispensing apparatus used on the premises of a licensed retailer for dispensing draught beer shall conspicuously indicate thereon the brand or trade name of the beer or the trademark of the manufacturer of the beer drawn therefrom.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1036, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 5, p. 543.

§ 23-1044. Procedure on refusal to grant license.

Upon a determination by the director or by the licensing authority of any county or municipality to refuse issuance of a license to an applicant upon original application, the same procedure herein provided for in cases involving refusal to grant renewal of license for notice and for proceedings to contest determination shall govern insofar as the same are applicable, except that issuance of temporary license shall not be required pending proceedings to contest determination.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1044, as added by 1961, ch. 299, § 7, p. 543; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 59, p. 811.